Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 3 SCHOOL DISTRICTS
33-317A. Legislative intent — Cooperative service agency — School plant facility levy.

For the purpose of constructing and maintaining facilities of a cooperative service agency, a properly constituted cooperative service agency may request from its member school districts additional funding to be furnished by a tax levy not to exceed four-tenths of one percent (.4%) of market value for assessment purposes in each year, as such valuation existed on December 31, of the previous year, for a period not to exceed three (3) years. Such levy shall be authorized by an election held in each of the school districts pursuant to chapter 4, title 33, Idaho Code. The question of a levy to be submitted to the electors of each member school district and the notice of such election shall state the dollar amount proposed to be collected each year during the period of years in each of which the collection is proposed to be made, the percentage of votes in favor of the proposal which are needed to approve the proposed dollar amount to be collected, and the purposes for which such funds shall be used. Said notice shall be given, the election shall be conducted and the returns canvassed as provided in chapter 4, title 33, Idaho Code; and the dollar amount to be collected shall be approved only if:

Fifty-five percent (55%) of the district electors voting in such election are in favor thereof if the levy will result in a total levy for school plant facilities of less than two-tenths of one percent (.2%) of market value for assessment purposes as such valuation existed on December 31 of the year immediately preceding the election;

Sixty percent (60%) of the district electors voting in such election are in favor thereof if the levy will result in a total levy for school plant facilities of two-tenths of one percent (.2%) or more and less than three-tenths of one percent (.3%) of market value for assessment purposes as such valuation existed on December 31 of the year immediately preceding the election; or

Two-thirds (2/3) of the district electors voting in such election are in favor thereof if the levy will result in a total levy for school plant facilities of three-tenths of one percent (.3%) or more of market value for assessment purposes as such valuation existed on December 31 of the year immediately preceding the election.

Physical construction may commence once moneys equal to the estimated cost of constructing the facility have been collected by the cooperative service agency, except that the cooperative service agency may commence physical construction before moneys equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the estimated cost of constructing the facility have been collected as long as language is included in the instructions to bidders reflecting the following:

Providing notice of the funding method and schedule;

Clearly stating that if all moneys are not collected according to the schedule provided, the contractor may not be paid in a timely manner and such contractor will have to await payment until the necessary moneys are collected, but in no event shall such contractor have to await payment longer than three (3) years from the date of the contractor’s last pay request;

Stating that the cooperative service agency accepts no liability and will pay no interest on unpaid balances;

Stating that should an inability to pay occur after the fifty percent (50%) completion point of the project, the contractor must complete the project irrespective of payment status; and

Stating that if an inability to pay occurs before the fifty percent (50%) completion point, the contractor has the option to suspend work, receiving no compensation for delay, and restart the project when funding becomes available.

If one (1) or more of the member districts fails to approve the tax levy in such election, the cooperative service agency may construct the facility through the support of the member districts approving the levy, but in no event shall the levy limits authorized in this section be exceeded.

Nothing shall prevent a member district that initially failed to approve the levy from conducting a subsequent election, held pursuant to chapter 4, title 33, Idaho Code, to authorize that district’s participation in construction of the facility.

The administration and accounting of moneys received by imposition of the levy provided for in this section shall be the same as provided in section 33-317(2), Idaho Code.

If the question be approved, each member school district of the cooperative service agency may make a levy, not to exceed four-tenths of one percent (.4%) of market value for assessment purposes as such valuation existed on December 31 of the previous year, in each year for which the collection was approved, sufficient to collect the dollar amount approved and may again submit the question at the expiration of the period of such levy, for the dollar amount to be collected during each year, and the number of years which the board may at that time determine. Or, during the period approved at any such election, if such period be less than three (3) years or the levy be less than four-tenths of one percent (.4%) of market value for assessment purposes as such valuation existed on December 31 of the previous year, the cooperative service agency may request that its member school districts submit to the qualified school district electors in the same manner as before, the question whether the number of years, not to exceed three (3), or the levy, or both, be increased, but not to exceed the maximum herein authorized. If such increase or increases be approved by the electors, the terms of such levy shall be in lieu of those approved in the first instance, but disapproval shall not affect any terms theretofore in effect.
(2) Physical construction may commence once moneys equal to the estimated cost of constructing the facility have been collected by the cooperative service agency, except that the cooperative service agency may commence physical construction before moneys equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the estimated cost of constructing the facility have been collected as long as language is included in the instructions to bidders reflecting the following:

33-318. Fair share of expenses — Appropriation from school district funds.

For the services and materials received from a cooperative service agency, boards of trustees may appropriate from school district funds and pay to the service agency an amount determined by the governing body of the agency to be their fair share of the expenses involved.

33-319. Rural school districts — Rural public charter schools.

A school district shall be considered a rural school district if it meets one (1) of the following two (2) criteria:

There are fewer than twenty (20) enrolled students per square mile within the area encompassed by the school district’s boundaries; or

The county in which a plurality of the school district’s market value for assessment purposes is located contains less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) residents, based on the most recent decennial United States census.

A public charter school shall be considered a rural public charter school if the school district in which the public charter school is physically located meets the definition of a rural school district, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. A public charter school that is also a virtual school shall be considered a rural public charter school if over fifty percent (50%) of its enrolled students reside within school districts that meet the definition of a rural school district pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

33-320. Continuous improvement plans and training.

Each school district and public charter school in Idaho shall develop an annual plan that is part of a continuous focus on improving the student performance of the district or public charter school.

The board of trustees and the superintendent shall collaborate on the plan and engage students, parents, educators and the community as appropriate. The board of directors and the administrator of a public charter school shall collaborate on the plan and engage students, parents, educators and the community as appropriate.
(2)(a) The board of trustees and the superintendent shall collaborate on the plan and engage students, parents, educators and the community as appropriate. The board of directors and the administrator of a public charter school shall collaborate on the plan and engage students, parents, educators and the community as appropriate.

The annual continuous improvement plan shall:

Be data driven, specifically in student outcomes, and shall include, but not be limited to, analyses of demographic data, student achievement and growth data, graduation rates, and college and career readiness;

Set clear and measurable targets based on student outcomes;

Include a clearly developed and articulated vision and mission;

Include key indicators for monitoring performance;

Include, at a minimum, the student achievement and growth metrics reported on each school and district’s report card as required by the state board of education and published by the state department of education; and

Include a report of progress toward the previous year’s improvement goals.

The annual continuous improvement plan must be reviewed and updated annually no later than October 1 each year.

The board of trustees or the board of directors shall continuously monitor progress toward the goals by utilizing relevant data to measure growth. The progress shall be included in evaluations of the district superintendent or administrator of a public charter school.

The plan must be made available to the public and shall be posted on the school district or charter school website.

Of the moneys appropriated in the public schools educational support program, up to six thousand six hundred dollars ($6,600) shall be distributed to each school district and public charter school to be expended for training purposes for district superintendents and boards of trustees, public charter school administrators and boards of directors. Funds shall be distributed on a reimbursement basis based on a process prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Qualified training shall include training for continuous improvement processes and planning, strategic planning, finance, superintendent evaluations, public charter administrator evaluations, ethics and governance.

The state board of education shall be granted rulemaking authority to establish appropriate procedures, qualifications and guidelines for qualified training providers and shall prepare a list of qualified training providers within the state of Idaho.

33-321 — 33-350. [Reserved.]

The board of trustees of any school district which operates two (2) or more high schools may at any time, on its own motion or upon the filing with the board of trustees of a petition so requesting signed by not less than fifty (50) school electors, call an election to submit to the qualified electors of the school district the question of the creation of one (1) or more school subdistricts. Such election shall be called, the election shall be held subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, and shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code. The proceedings calling such election shall set forth the boundaries of each proposed school subdistrict and shall provide for the submission of the question of the creation of each such school subdistrict to the qualified electors of the school district and to the qualified electors residing within the proposed boundaries of each such school subdistrict. No proposition for the creation of a school subdistrict shall be determined to have carried unless such proposition shall receive a majority of the votes cast on such proposition by the qualified electors residing within the boundaries of the school district and a majority of the votes cast on such proposition by the qualified electors residing within the boundaries of the proposed school subdistrict. Whenever the creation of more than one (1) school subdistrict is submitted at the same election, separate ballots and separate propositions shall be used in voting on the question of creating each school subdistrict.

33-352. Establishment.

Whenever a proposition for the creation of a school subdistrict shall have been approved in the manner set forth in section 33-351, Idaho Code, the board of trustees of the school district shall enter in its minutes an order providing for the establishment and creation of the school subdistrict setting forth therein the legal description of the boundaries thereof and shall designate therein a name for such school subdistrict. Within ten (10) days after the entry of the order creating such school subdistrict, the board of trustees shall certify the fact of the creation of such school subdistrict to the state board of education and to the board of county commissioners of each county in which any part of the school subdistrict is located, by the filing of a certified copy of the order of the board of trustees creating and establishing the school subdistrict.

33-353. Nature and powers.

Each school subdistrict created and established as provided in this act shall be a political subdivision of the state of Idaho. The board of trustees entering the order creating and establishing such school subdistrict shall be the governing body of all school subdistricts created by it, and shall possess the power to order, conduct and hold all elections in such school subdistricts for the purpose of incurring debt and issuing bonds and for the purpose of voting school plant facilities reserve fund levies.

33-354. Indebtedness — Bond issues.

School subdistricts may incur debt and issue bonds for the same purposes as set forth in section 33-1102, Idaho Code. The governing body of a school subdistrict may submit to the qualified electors of the school subdistrict the question of whether the governing body of the school subdistrict shall be empowered to issue negotiable bonds of the school subdistrict in an amount and for a period of time to be named in the notice of election. Notice of the bond election shall be given, the election shall be conducted and the returns thereof canvassed and the qualifications of electors voting or offering to vote shall be as provided in title 34, Idaho Code. The question of the issuance of such bonds shall be approved only if the percentage of votes cast at such election were cast in favor thereof as that which is now, or may hereafter be, set by the constitution of the state of Idaho. All such bonds shall be authorized, issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of sections 33-1107 through 33-1121, Idaho Code. No bonds of a school subdistrict may be issued, however, if the issuance of such bonds would cause the percentage of market value for assessment purposes of taxable property within the boundaries of the school subdistrict represented by the aggregate outstanding indebtedness of the school subdistrict, when added to the percentage of the assessed valuation of taxable property represented by the aggregate outstanding indebtedness of the school district within which the school subdistrict lies, to exceed five percent (5%). As used in the preceding sentence hereof, “market value for assessment purposes,” “aggregate outstanding indebtedness” and “issuance” shall have the same meanings as set forth in section 33-1103, Idaho Code. Upon the approval of the issuance of such bonds, the same may be issued by the governing body of the school subdistrict on behalf of the school subdistrict at any time within two (2) years from the date of such election. Wherever in title 34, Idaho Code, and in sections 33-1107 through 33-1121, Idaho Code, reference is made to “school district”; for purposes of this chapter it shall be deemed to refer to school subdistricts.

33-355. Levy for plant facilities reserve fund — Election.

The governing body of a school subdistrict may call an election in the school subdistrict, pursuant to the provisions of section 33-804, Idaho Code, for the purpose of submitting to the qualified school electors of the school subdistrict the question of a levy by a school subdistrict of a school plant facilities reserve fund tax.

33-356. School building design and energy efficiency.

School districts may seek to qualify for a reduction in building replacement value calculation for qualified, newly constructed public school buildings pursuant to section 33-1019(4), Idaho Code.
(1)(a) School districts may seek to qualify for a reduction in building replacement value calculation for qualified, newly constructed public school buildings pursuant to section 33-1019(4), Idaho Code.

Each school district that seeks to qualify a newly constructed building for the building replacement value calculation provided for in section 33-1019(4), Idaho Code, shall use integrated design practices and fundamental commissioning in the design and construction of such building.

Following the first year of operations of a building that was certified in accordance with the provisions of subsection (5)(a) of this section, the germane school district shall perform or cause to be performed an annual optimization review of the qualifying building. Such annual optimization review shall be performed in a manner that is consistent with rules promulgated pursuant to this section. Such school district shall thereafter perform or cause to be performed an annual optimization review each year it seeks to qualify such building for the building replacement value calculation provided in section 33-1019(4), Idaho Code.

For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Fundamental commissioning” means the use of a third party to review building design, building system specifications and to specify and monitor preoccupancy system testing to ensure functional integration of specified systems and functional operation of systems at the completion of a project.

“Integrated design” means a process to develop consensus among the project team and owner as to the energy savings and building performance goals of the project and to identify design strategies to achieve those goals, including documentation strategies for design decisions to ensure accurate implementation of design through construction.

It shall be the duty and responsibility of the administrator of the division of building safety to provide assistance to school districts to ensure school districts can access the technical and educational support needed to implement the processes of integrated design and fundamental commissioning. It shall further be the duty and responsibility of the administrator of the division of building safety to compile and cause to be made available to school districts a list of all third party building commissioning agents in Idaho and contiguous states. The administrator shall ensure that all commissioning agents that appear on such list are certified by the building commissioning association or other similar certifying entity. The administrator shall ensure that such list is updated annually.

The administrator of the division of building safety is hereby authorized and directed to promulgate rules in accordance with the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, that provide the guidance, education and technical information necessary for school districts to implement the processes of integrated design and fundamental commissioning. The administrator is authorized to expand upon the terms defined in subsection (2) of this section, and to provide additional definitions as needed. In addition, the administrator shall promulgate rules governing annual optimization review and evaluation of germane building systems to ensure optimal performance of such systems and maximum energy savings and building performance. Such rules shall include, but not be limited to, a definition for the minimum scope of work required for annual optimization.
(5)(a) The administrator of the division of building safety shall certify to the state department of education when a building has qualified for school building replacement value calculation exclusions as provided for in section 33-1019(4), Idaho Code. As part of such certification, the administrator shall state specifically the school building(s) and the square footage thereof that shall be excluded from the school building replacement value calculations.

(b) Following the first year of operations of a building that was certified in accordance with the provisions of subsection (5)(a) of this section, the administrator of the division of building safety shall certify to the state department of education when such building has undergone an annual optimization review as provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section. Such certification shall ensure that the qualifying building meets or exceeds the requirements of annual optimization review rules promulgated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

33-357. Creation of internet based expenditure website.

As used in this section, unless otherwise required:

“Education provider” means:

A school district, including a specially chartered district organized and existing pursuant to law;

A cooperative services agency or intermediate school district;

A public charter school authorized pursuant to state law;

A publicly funded governmental entity established by the state for the express purpose of providing online courses.

“Entity” means a corporation, association, union, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, grantee, contractor, local government or other legal entity, including a nonprofit corporation or an employee of the education provider.

“Public record” shall have the same meaning as set forth in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

No later than December 1, 2011, each education provider shall develop and maintain a publicly available website where the education provider’s expenditures are posted in a nonsearchable PDF format, a searchable PDF format, a spreadsheet or in a database format.
(2)(a) No later than December 1, 2011, each education provider shall develop and maintain a publicly available website where the education provider’s expenditures are posted in a nonsearchable PDF format, a searchable PDF format, a spreadsheet or in a database format.

The internet based website shall include the following data concerning all expenditures made by the education provider:

The name and location or address of the entity receiving moneys;

The amount of expended moneys;

The date of the expenditure;

A description of the purpose of the expenditure, unless the expenditure is self-describing;

Supporting contracts and performance reports upon which the expenditure is related when these documents already exist;

To the extent possible, a unique identifier for each expenditure;

The annual budget approved by the education provider’s governing board, to be posted within thirty (30) days after its approval; and

Any current master labor agreements approved by the education provider’s governing board.

The expenditure data shall be provided in an open structured data format that may be downloaded by the user.

The internet based website shall contain only information that is a public record or that is not confidential or otherwise exempt from public disclosure pursuant to state or federal law.

The education provider shall:

Update the expenditures contained on the internet based website at least monthly;

Archive all expenditures, which shall remain accessible and on the internet based website for a number of years, consistent with state law regarding keeping and retention of records;

Make the internet based website easily accessible from the main page of the education provider’s website; and
(d) The website shall include those records beginning on the effective date of this act on July 1, 2011, and all data prior to that date shall be available by way of a public records request.

33-351. Subdistricts — Authority to establish — Election.